Missouri, session 2026, SB1574.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.578, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 67.578,
to read as follows:
67.578. 1. The governing authority of any county of
the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than sixteen thousand four hundred
but less than sixteen thousand five hundred inhabitants and
any county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than eight thousand five hundred but fewer than ten
thousand inhabitants may impose a sales tax in an amount not
to exceed one-fifth of one percent on all retail sales made
in the county which are subject to taxation pursuant to
sections 144.010 to 144.525, to be used solely for the
funding of museums. For purposes of this section, the term
"museums" means museums operating in the county, which are
registered with the United States Internal Revenue Service
as a 501(c)(3) corporation and which are considered by the
board to be a tourism attraction. The tax authorized by
this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales

SB 1574 2
taxes allowed by law, except that no sales tax shall be
imposed pursuant to this section unless the governing
authority submits to the voters of the county, at a county
or state general, primary, or special election, a proposal
to authorize the governing authority to impose the tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need
not be limited to, the following language:
Shall the county of ______ (insert the name of the
county) impose a sales tax of ______ (insert rate
of percent) percent for the funding of museums?
"Museums" means museums operating in the county,
which are registered with the United States
Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3)
corporation and which are considered by the museum
board to be a tourism attraction.
□ YES □ NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"NO".
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the
qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the sales tax shall become effective on the
first day of the second calendar quarter after the director
of revenue receives notice of the adoption of the tax. If
the proposal receives less than the required majority of
votes, then the governing authority shall have no power to
impose the tax unless and until the governing authority has
again submitted another proposal to authorize the governing
authority to impose the sales tax authorized by this section

SB 1574 3
and such proposal is approved by the required majority of
the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. On or after the effective date of the tax, the
director of revenue shall be responsible for the
administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of
the tax, and sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply. The
director may retain an amount not to exceed one percent for
deposit in the general revenue fund to offset the costs of
collection. In order to permit sellers required to collect
and report the sales tax to collect the amount required to
be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements
of reporting or remitting the tax, or to serve as a levy of
the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of pennies, the
governing authority may authorize the use of a bracket
system similar to that authorized in section 144.285, and
notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this new
bracket system shall be used where this tax is imposed and
shall apply to all taxable transactions. Beginning with the
effective date of the tax, every retailer in the county
shall add the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax
shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer until paid,
and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as the
purchase price. For purposes of this section, all retail
sales shall be deemed to be consummated at the place of
business of the retailer.
4. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to
144.525 governing the state sales tax, and section 32.057,
the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the
collection of the tax, and all exemptions granted to
agencies of government, organizations, and persons pursuant
to sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to
the imposition and collection of the tax. The same sales

SB 1574 4
tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the
administration and collection of the state sales tax shall
satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional
permit or exemption certificate or retail certificate shall
be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption
from the tax. All discounts allowed the retailer pursuant
to the state sales tax law for the collection of and for
payment of taxes are hereby allowed and made applicable to
the tax. The penalties for violations provided in section
32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made
applicable to violations of this section. If any person is
delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid
pursuant to this section, or in the event a determination
has been made against the person for taxes and penalty
pursuant to this section, the limitation for bringing suit
for the collection of the delinquent tax and penalty shall
be the same as that provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525.
5. The governing authority may authorize any museum
100 board already existing in the county, or may establish a
101 museum board, to expend revenue collected pursuant to this
102 section. In the event that no museum board already exists,
103 the board established pursuant to this section shall consist
104 of six members who are appointed by the governing authority
105 from a list of candidates supplied by the chair of each of
106 the two major political parties of the county, with three
107 members from each of the two parties. Members shall serve
108 for three-year terms, but of the members first appointed,
109 one shall be appointed for a term of one year, two shall be
110 appointed for a term of two years, and two shall be
111 appointed for a term of three years. Each member shall be a

SB 1574 5
112 resident of the county. The members shall not receive
113 compensation for service on the board, but shall be
114 reimbursed from the revenues collected pursuant to this
115 section for any reasonable and necessary expenses incurred
116 in service on the board. The board shall determine in what
117 manner the revenues will be expended, and disbursements of
118 these moneys shall be made strictly in accordance with this
119 section. Expenditures may be made for the employment of
120 personnel selected by the board to assist in carrying out
121 the duties of the board, and the board is expressly
122 authorized to employ such personnel.
123 6. The governing authority may submit the question of
124 repeal of the tax to the voters at any county or state
125 general, primary, or special election. The ballot of
126 submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the
127 following language:
128 Shall the county of ______ (insert name of county)
129 repeal the sales tax of ______ (insert rate of
130 percent) percent for the funding of museums?
131 □ YES □ NO
132 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X"
133 in the box opposite "YES". If you are opposed to
134 the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
135 "NO".
136 If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor
137 of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December
138 thirty-first of the calendar year in which the repeal was
139 approved.
✓